Illinois, session 104th, SB3031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-550 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-550 new)7    Sec. 27-550. Latine studies. 8    (a) Every public elementary and high school shall include 9in its curriculum the study of the contributions made by Latin 10Americans to the economic, cultural, social, and political 11development of the United States. The instruction shall 12include the events of the Latine experience and Latin American 13history, including the contributions made by Latin Americans 14in government and the arts, humanities, and sciences, as well 15as the effects of colonialism in society.16    (b) The regional superintendent of schools shall monitor a 17school district's compliance with the requirements of this 18Section during the regional superintendent's annual compliance 19visit and make recommendations for improvement, including 20professional development. Failure by a school district or 21school to comply with this Section shall result in a written 22warning for the first offense. If the school district or 23school continues to fail to comply with this Section, the   SB3031- 2 -LRB104 20157 LNS 33608 b1school district or school shall face disciplinary action at 2the discretion of the regional superintendent.3    (c) The State Superintendent of Education shall prepare 4and make available to all school boards instructional 5materials and professional development opportunities that may 6be used as guidelines for the development of a unit of study 7under this Section. However, each school board shall determine 8the minimum amount of instructional time that qualifies as a 9unit of study satisfying the requirements of this Section. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect August 111, 2026.